Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-501
Secretary of State; Great Seal; custodian.

The Secretary of State shall safely keep and not suffer to be imitated or counterfeited the Great Seal of the State of Nebraska of the form and design prescribed by the Act approved June 15, 1867, as follows:

Laws 1867, § 1, p. 57;

R.S.1913, § 5569;

C.S.1922, § 4873;

C.S.1929, § 84-501;

R.S.1943, § 84-501.
Section 1 of the act of 1867 is as follows: "Section 1. Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Nebraska, That the Secretary of State be, and he is hereby authorized and required to procure, at the cost and expense of the state, and as soon after the passage of this act as practicable, a seal for the state, to be designated and known as the Great Seal of the State of Nebraska, and of the design and device following, that is to say: The eastern part of the circle to be represented by a steamboat ascending the Missouri river; the mechanic arts to be represented by a smith with hammer and anvil; in the foreground, agriculture to be represented by a settler's cabin, sheaves of wheat and stalks of growing corn; in the background a train of cars heading towards the Rocky Mountains, and on the extreme west, the Rocky Mountains to be plainly in view; around the top of this circle to be in capital letters, the motto. 'EQUALITY BEFORE THE LAW,' and the circle to be surrounded with the words, 'Great Seal of the State of Nebraska, March 1st, 1867.'"